Utah statutes.
48-2c-311.   Venue for action against foreign company.
Any person who has a cause of action against any foreign company, whether or
not the company is authorized to transact business in this state, may file
suit against the company in the district court of any county in which there is
proper venue if the cause of action arose in Utah out of the company's
transacting business in Utah or while the company was transacting business in
Utah.
